District of Columbia statutes.
19-502

Requirement of survival by 120 hours under probate laws.

(a)

Except as provided in section 19-506, if the title to property, the devolution of property, the right to elect an interest in property, or the right to exempt property, homestead or family allowance depends upon an individual’s survivorship of the death of another individual, an individual who is not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived the other individual by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the other individual.

(b)

This section does not apply if its application would result in a taking of intestate estate by the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 202, 48 DCR 2087

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-604.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-502.
1973 Ed., § 19-502.

Editor's Notes

This section was previously enacted by section 1 of Public Law 89-183, 79 Stat. 700, but repealed by implication by D.C. Law 13-292.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (1993 Act).